Hawaii statutes.
CHAPTER
269

PUBLIC
UTILITIES COMMISSION

Part I. Public Utilities, Generally

Section

269-1 Definitions

269-2 Public utilities commission; number,
appointment

of commissioners, qualifications;
compensation;

persons having interest in public
utilities;

authority

269-3 Employment of assistants

269-4 Repealed

269-5 Annual report and register of orders

269-6 General powers and duties

269-6.5 Electronic copies of documents

269-7 Investigative powers

269-7.5 Certificates of public convenience and
necessity

269-8 Public utilities to furnish information

269-8.2 Location of records

269-8.5 Annual financial reports

269-9 Report accidents

269-10 Commission may compel attendance of witnesses,
etc.

269-11 Repealed

269-12 Notices

269-13 Right to be represented by counsel

269-14 Repealed

269-14.5 Appointment of receiver for public
utilities

269-15 Commission may institute proceedings to
enforce

chapter

269-15.5 Appeals

269-15.51 Contested cases

269-15.6 Alternative dispute resolution

269-16 Regulation of utility rates; ratemaking
procedures

269-16.2 Approval of rules of a public utility

269-16.21 Repealed

269-16.22 Power purchase agreements; cost recovery
for electric

utilities

269-16.3 Statewide rate increase surcharge
assessment on

ratepayers in emergency situations

269-16.4 Annual fuel mix disclosure

269-16.5 Lifeline telephone rates

269-16.6 Telecommunications relay services for the deaf,

persons with hearing disabilities, and
persons with

speech disabilities

269-16.7 Repealed

269-16.8 Aggregators of telephone service
requirements

269-16.85 Retail intrastate services; fully
competitive

269-16.9 Telecommunications providers and services

269-16.91 Universal service subsidies

269-16.92 Changes in subscriber carrier selections;
prior

authorization required; penalties for
unauthorized

changes

269-16.93 Release of domestic abuse victims from
shared

wireless plans

269-16.95 Emergency telephone service; capital
costs;

ratemaking

269-17 Issuance of securities

269-17.5 Issuance of voting stock; restrictions

269-18 Acquirement of stock of another public
utility

269-19 Merger and consolidation of public utilities

269-19.5 Relations with an affiliated interest;
definition;

contracts with affiliates filed and
subject to

commission action

269-20 Certificates of public convenience and
necessity

for water carriers

269-21, 22 Repealed

269-23 Liability of initial and delivering common
carrier

for loss; limitation of liability; notice
and filing

of claim

269-24 Repealed

269-25 Valuations

269-26 Investigation of water rates charged by
lessee

under state leases

269-26.5 Preferential water rates for agricultural
activities

269-26.6 Preferential water carrier service rates
for

agricultural activities

269-27 Prevention of unreasonable water rates

269-27.1 Establishment of geothermal energy rates

269-27.2 Utilization of electricity generated from
nonfossil

fuels

269-27.3 Preferential renewable energy rates;
agricultural

activities

269-27.4 Community-based renewable energy tariffs

269-27.5 Construction of high-voltage electric
transmission

lines; hearing

269-27.6 Construction of high-voltage electric
transmission

lines; overhead or underground
construction

269-28 Penalty

269-29 Perjury

269-30 Finances; public utility fee

269-31 Application of this chapter

269-32 Injury to public utility property

269-33 Public utilities commission special fund

269-34 Obligations of telecommunications carriers

269-35 Universal service

269-36 Telecommunications number portability

269-37 Compensation agreements

269-38 Regulatory flexibility for effectively
competitive

services

269-39 Cross-subsidies

269-40 Access to advanced services

269-41 Universal service program; establishment;
purpose;

principles

269-42 Universal service program; contributions

269-43 Carriers of last resort

269-44 Solar water heater system standards

269-45 Gas utility companies; renewable energy;
reporting

requirements

Part II. Consumer Advocate

269-51 Consumer advocate; executive director of the

division of consumer advocacy

269-52 Division of consumer advocacy; personnel

269-53 Legal counsel

269-54 General powers; duties

269-55 Handling of complaints

Part III. Other Provisions

269-71 Meter tampering

Part IV. Gas Pipeline Systems--Repealed

269-81 to 84 Repealed

Part V. Renewable Portfolio Standards

269-91 Definitions

269-92 Renewable portfolio standards

269-93 Achieving portfolio standard

269-94 Waivers, extensions, and incentives

269-95 Renewable portfolio standards study

269-96 Energy-efficiency portfolio standards

Part VI. Net Energy Metering

269-101 Definitions

269-101.5 Maximum capacity of eligible
customer-generator

269-102 Standard contract or tariff; rate
structure

269-103 Generating capacity

269-104 Additional customer-generators

269-105 Calculation

269-106 Billing periods; twelve-month
reconciliation

269-107 Net electricity consumers

269-108 Net electricity producers; excess
electricity

credits and credit carry over

269-109 Net electricity consumption or production

information

269-110 Termination by eligible
customer-generators

269-111 Safety and performance standards

Part VII. Public Benefits Fee

269-121 Public benefits fee authorization

269-122 Public benefits fee administrator;
establishment

269-123 Requirements for the public benefits fee

administrator

269-124 Transitioning from utility demand-side
management

programs to the public benefits fee

269‑125 On-bill financing for energy
efficiency and renewable

energy

Part VIII. Interisland Transmission System

269-131 Definitions

269-132 Certification

269-133 Transmission tariff

269-134 Cable surcharge

269-135 Recovery of electric utility company costs

Part IX. Electric Reliability

269-141 Definitions

269-142 Reliability standards; interconnection

requirements; adoption and development;
force

and effect

269-143 Monitoring

269-144 Compliance and enforcement

269-145 Grid access; procedures for
interconnection;

dispute resolution

269-145.5 Advanced grid modernization technology;
principles

269-146 Hawaii electricity reliability surcharge;

authorization; cost recovery

269-147 Hawaii electricity reliability
administrator;

contracting

269-148 Hawaii electricity reliability
administrator;

qualifications

269-149 Funding; reporting

Part X. Green Infrastructure Bonds

269-161 Definitions

269-162 Applications to issue bonds and authorize
green

infrastructure fee

269-163 Green infrastructure financing order

269-164 Green infrastructure property

269-165 Bonds financing order

269-166 Green infrastructure fee; nonbypassable

269-167 Electric utility successor requirements;
default

of electric utility

269-168 Treatment of bonds, fees, and property

269-169 Green infrastructure property;
non-impairment

269-170 Green infrastructure loan program order;
application

269-171 Green infrastructure loan program order;
issuance

269-172 Electric utilities; cost recovery; billing
agent

269-173 Severability

269-174 Miscellaneous

269-175 Revenue bonds; exclusion from debt limit

269-176 Financing order; adjustments to green

infrastructure fee

Note

Broadband services; exemption from certain permitting requirements.
L 2011, c 151; L 2013, c 264; L 2016, c 193, §§1, 2.

Franchises prior to 1966, see RLH 1955, volume II appendix at
page 1720 and 1965 Supp at page 1039.

Greenhouse gas emissions reduction task force (report to 2010
legislature and every five years thereafter). L 2007, c 234, §§1 to 7.

Honolulu Gas Company. L 1967, c 262.

Judiciary report to 2019 legislature on change in judicial
proceedings made by L 2016, c 48. L 2016, c 48, §11.

Kauai Electric Company, Limited. L 1967, c 165.

Maui Electric Company, Limited. L 1991, c 12.

Maui Electric Company, Limited (for Lanai). L 1988, c 54.

Molokai Electric Company, Limited. L 1989, c 147.

Solar water heating pay as you save program pilot project. L
2006, c 240, §13.

Cross References

Natural energy laboratory of Hawaii authority as public
utility; when, see §227D-1.5.

Telecommunications and cable industry information reporting,
see chapter 440J.

Previous
Vol05_Ch0261-0319
Next